Utah statutes.
78B-6-109.   Determination of rights prior to adoption petition.

(1) (a)  Any interested person may petition a court having jurisdiction over adoption proceedings for a determination of the rights and interests of any person who may claim an interest in a child under this part.

(b)  The petition described in Subsection (1) may be filed at any time before the finalization of the adoption, including before:

(i)  the child's birth;

(ii)  a petition for adoption is filed; or

(iii)  a petition to terminate parental rights is filed.

(2)  If a petition for adoption or a petition to terminate parental rights has been filed in district court, the petitioner or any interested person may, without filing a separate petition, move the court for a determination of the rights and interests of any person who may claim an interest in a child under this part.

